src/twol-deu.txt
Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð



 %#:0 %>:0

 X1:0 X2:0 X3:0 X4:0 X5:0 X6:0 X7:0 X8:0 X9:0
 Q1:0 Q2:0 Q3:0 Q4:0 Q5:0 Q6:0 Q7:0 Q8:0 Q9:0
 Y1:0 Y2:0 Y3:0 Y4:0 Y5:0 Y6:0 Y7:0 Y8:0 Y9:0 
 Z1:0 Z2:0 Z3:0 Z4:0 Z5:0 Z6:0 Z7:0 Z8:0 Z9:0 ;

Sets
 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å ä ö ü 
       A E I O U Y Æ Ø Å Ä Ö Ü ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ß 
       B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z;
 LNR = l n r ;
 Dummy = X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9
 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 Q5 Q6 Q7 Q8 Q9
 Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y8 Y9 
 Z1 Z2 Z3 Z4 Z5 Z6 Z7 Z8 Z9 ;  ! %+ 


Rules

"Umlaut"
 Vx:Vy <=>  Cns _ Cns:+ ( e LNR ) X1: %>:  ;
    where Vx in (u o a U O A)
          Vy in (ü ö ä Ü Ö Ä )
          matched ;
          
!€ NapfX1%>e#
!€ Näpf00e0

!€ BodenX1%>#
!€ Böden000

!$ NapfX1%>e#
!$ Napf00e0

!$ BodenX1%>#
!$ Boden000

          
"Umlaut vor Vokal" 
 Vx:Vy <=>  Cns _ [ u | a: ] Cns:+ ( e LNR ) X1: %>:  ;
    where Vx in (a A)
          Vy in (ä Ä)
          matched ;         
 
!€ BaumX1%>e#
!€ Bäum00e0

"Entfernung von a in aa Umlaut"
a:0 <=> a: _ Cns:+ ( e LNR ) X1: %>:  ;

!€ SaalX1%>e#
!€ Sä0l00e0



"Weak e Deletion"
 e:0 <=> Vow Cns:+ _ (Dummy:) %>: e ;

!€ Nomade%>en#
!€ Nomad00en0

!$ Nomade%>en#
!$ Nomade0en0
           
